Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-225.01
Utilization-of-funds member, defined.

Utilization-of-funds member shall mean a member of the organization who shall be responsible for the proper utilization of the gross receipts derived from the conduct of bingo by the licensed organization.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 25.